Florida, session 2026, HB391.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. No later than December 1, 2026, the
Commissioner of Agriculture shall identify the three state
universities and Florida College System institutions that have
the highest percentage of Pell Grant-eligible students and
report such information to the President of the Senate and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives.
Section 2. (1) The Office of Program Policy Analysis and
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb391-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 391 2026
Government Accountability (OPPAGA) shall conduct a study to
evaluate food insecurity on the campuses of state universities
and Florida College System institutions.
(2) The study must include recommendations for any changes
to general law, Board of Governors' rules and regulations, or
State Board of Education rules needed to address food insecurity
on the campuses of state universities and Florida College System
institutions.
(3) In conducting the study, OPPAGA shall consult with the
Board of Governors of the State University System, the board of
trustees of the Florida College System, the Department of
Education, and any other relevant stakeholders.
(4) OPPAGA shall submit a report on its findings to the
President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives by December 1, 2026.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb391-00